src/fst/stems/adverbs.lexc
!! Adverbs
! ---------
LEXICON Adv
+Adv: #;

LEXICON Adverbs

!adverbs of time
မနှစ်က Adv "";
တမြန်နေ့ Adv "";
တမြန်မနေ့ Adv "";
တမြန်နှစ် Adv "";
မနေ့က Adv "";
မနက်ဖြန် Adv "";
မနက်ဖန် Adv "";
သန်ဘက်ခါ Adv "";
ဖိန်းနွှဲခါ Adv "";
! are these adverbs, or aspect markers, or both?
ပြီး Adv "";
လွန် Adv "";
ပြီးခဲ့တဲ့ Adv "";
လွန်ခဲ့တဲ့ Adv "";
